Maine, session 132, LD1875.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 36 MRSA c. 456 is enacted to read:
CHAPTER 456
ELECTRIC VEHICLE ROAD USE FEES
§3051. Road use fee for electric vehicles
In addition to the annual fee for registration of motor vehicles pursuant to Title 29-A,
section 501, registration of electric vehicles is subject to this section.
1. Definitions. As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise indicates, the
following terms have the following meanings.
A. "Battery electric vehicle" has the same meaning as in Title 35-A, section 10126,
subsection 1, paragraph A.
B. "Electric vehicle" means a battery electric vehicle and a plug-in hybrid electric
vehicle.
C. "Fund" means the Electric Vehicle Road Use Fee Fund established in subsection 5.
D. "Gasoline tax" means the excise tax imposed on internal combustion engine fuel
used or sold in this State pursuant to section 2903.
E. "Mileage registration form" means the form completed by a person registering an
electric vehicle pursuant to subsection 2.
F. "Plug-in hybrid electric vehicle" has the same meaning as in Title 35-A, section
10126, subsection 1, paragraph D.
2. Mileage registration form. Beginning January 1, 2026, a person registering an
electric vehicle pursuant to Title 29-A, section 501 shall complete, at the same time, a
mileage registration form provided by the bureau stating the mileage of the electric vehicle
at the time of registration. A person who knowingly misrepresents the actual mileage of
the electric vehicle at the time of registration on the mileage registration form commits
forgery and is in violation of Title 17-A, section 703. The assessor shall make the mileage
registration form available to municipalities and on the bureau's publicly accessible
website.
3. Return of forms to bureau. A municipality that receives a completed mileage
registration form shall forward that form to the bureau within 30 days of receipt of the
mileage registration form.
4. Calculation and levy of fee. The bureau, based on the mileage stated on a mileage
registration form, shall calculate the fee due from each registrant of an electric vehicle
pursuant to this subsection.
A. The bureau shall subtract from the mileage stated on the most recently received
mileage reimbursement form the mileage stated on the mileage reimbursement form
filed for that electric vehicle for the immediately prior year. This is the net mileage.
B. The bureau shall multiple the net mileage under paragraph A by:
Page 1 - 132LR1205(01)

(1) For battery electric vehicles, 1.0¢; and
(2) For plug-in hybrid electric vehicles, 0.5¢.
This amount is the electric vehicle road use fee.
C. The bureau shall notify the registrant of the electric vehicle of the amount of the
electric vehicle road use fee under paragraph B, that the registrant has 45 days to pay
the electric vehicle road use fee and that failure to pay will result in the suspension of
the registration of the electric vehicle for which the fee is due.
D. A registrant shall pay the electric vehicle road use fee within 45 days of receipt of
notice provided pursuant to paragraph C. Payment must be made to the bureau.
E. Notwithstanding paragraph B, if the amount of the gasoline tax changes from 30.0¢
per gallon, the assessor shall adjust the multipliers specified in paragraph B,
subparagraphs (1) and (2) to obtain an equivalent increase or decrease in the electric
vehicle road use fee.
F. All fees collected pursuant to this chapter must be deposited into the fund.
5. Electric Vehicle Road Use Fee Fund. The Electric Vehicle Road Use Fee Fund is
established as a nonlapsing fund within the bureau.
6. Use of fees for gasoline tax suspension; determination of dates; proclamation.
Fees collected pursuant to this chapter must be used to establish a suspension from the
gasoline tax as provided in this subsection.
A. Beginning January 15, 2027 and annually thereafter, the assessor shall determine
the amount of funds in the fund as of the end of the immediately preceding calendar
year and the amount of revenue collected from the gasoline tax imposed for that same
time period.
B. Using the amounts determined pursuant to paragraph A, the assessor shall divide
the amount of funds in the fund by the amount of revenue received from the gasoline
tax. The result must be multiplied by the number of days in the calendar year.
C. The result of the calculation performed pursuant to paragraph B, rounded to the
nearest whole number, is the number of days that the gasoline tax must be suspended
in the calendar year in which the calculation is performed.
D. The assessor shall inform the Governor and the joint standing committees of the
Legislature having jurisdiction over transportation matters and taxation matters of the
number of days of suspension of the gasoline tax required pursuant to paragraph C.
E. The Governor shall determine the date or dates on which the gasoline tax is
suspended, which must occur in the same calendar year in which the assessor informs
the Governor pursuant to paragraph D, and by proclamation shall announce the date or
dates of the suspension, notwithstanding section 2903.
7. Rules. The assessor shall adopt routine technical rules in accordance with Title 5,
chapter 375, subchapter 2-A to implement this chapter.